Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7251.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 35-3 of the General Laws entitled "State Budget" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
35-3-28. State spending growth limit.
(a) Definitions. For purposes of this section:
(1) "State spending" means the total amount of appropriations authorized by the general
assembly from all sources of revenue in the annual state budget.
(2) "Inflation rate" means the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers (CPI-U) for the most recent calendar year, as published by the U.S. Bureau of Labor
Statistics.
(3) "Personal income growth rate" means the percentage change in Rhode Island personal
income for the most recent calendar year, as published by the U.S. Bureau of Economic Analysis
or other reliable source designated by the director of administration.
(b) Spending growth limit. The total state spending authorized by the general assembly for
any fiscal year shall not exceed the total state spending authorized for the previous fiscal year
increased by the greater of:
(1) The inflation rate for the most recent calendar year; or
(2) The personal income growth rate for the most recent calendar year.
(c) Exceptions. The spending limit set forth in subsection (b) of this section shall not apply
to:

(1) Expenditures for debt service payments or retirement of principal on bonds;
(2) Federal funds received by the state and required to be spent under federal law;
(3) Emergency expenditures declared by the governor and approved by a two-thirds (2/3)
vote of the general assembly; and
(4) Any other exceptions as the general assembly may prescribe by law.
(d) Reporting. The director of administration shall annually publish a report comparing
actual state spending growth with the limits set forth in this section and submit it to the governor
and the general assembly.
(e) Enforcement. If the general assembly authorizes spending that exceeds the limits in
subsection (b) of this section, the governor shall provide a plan to reduce expenditures in the
following fiscal year to comply with the limits.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003654
========
LC003654 - Page 2 of 3